District of Columbia statutes.
26-1336

Right of Congress to amend or repeal chapter; remedies preserved.

Congress may at any time alter, amend, or repeal this chapter, but any such amendment or repeal shall not, nor shall the dissolution of any company formed under this chapter, take away or impair any remedy given against such corporation, its stockholders, or officers for any liability or penalty which shall have been previously incurred.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1309, ch. 854, § 748
1981 Ed., § 26-436.
1973 Ed., § 26-336.